Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.476

Background investigation rules—Updating.

(1) The office of financial management shall amend any existing rules established under RCW 41.06.475 and adopt rules developed in cooperation and agreement with the department of social and health services to implement the provisions of chapter 296, Laws of 2001.

(2) The legislature's delegation of authority to the agency under chapter 296, Laws of 2001 is strictly limited to:

(a) The minimum delegation necessary to administer the clear and unambiguous directives of chapter 296, Laws of 2001; and

(b) The administration of circumstances and behaviors foreseeable at *the time of enactment.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 426; 2001 c 296 s 6.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: 2001 c 296 attained final passage by the legislature on April 20, 2001, was signed by the governor and filed with the secretary of state on May 14, 2001, and took effect July 22, 2001.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Intent—2001 c 296: See note following RCW 9.96A.060.